Utah statutes.
58-76-103.   Professional Geologist Education and Enforcement Account.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Professional Geologist Education and Enforcement Account."

(2)  The restricted account shall consist of money from:

(a)  a surcharge fee established by the department in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, placed on initial, renewal, and reinstatement licensure fees under this chapter not to exceed 50% of the respective initial, renewal, or reinstatement licensure fee;

(b)  administrative penalties collected pursuant to this chapter; and

(c)  interest earned on money in the account.

(3)  Money in the account may be appropriated by the Legislature for the following purposes:

(a)  education and training of licensees under this chapter;

(b)  education and training of the public or other interested persons in matters concerning geology laws and practices;

(c)  enforcement of this chapter by:

(i)  investigating unprofessional or unlawful conduct;

(ii)  providing legal representation to the division when legal action is taken against a person engaging in unprofessional or unlawful conduct; and

(iii)  monitoring compliance of renewal requirements; and

(d)  education and training of board members.



Amended by Chapter 303, 2011 General Session

